Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4440.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 47. (1) The infectious disease worker safety commission is created in the department of labor and economic opportunity. (2) The director of the department of labor and economic opportunity shall appoint the members of the commission. The commission must consist of the following members: (a) Two individuals representing labor unions from 1 or more of the following sectors: (i) Health care. (ii) Law enforcement. (iii) Food delivery. (b) One individual representing private sector management. (c) One individual representing public sector management. (d) Three individuals who work in health care and specialize in epidemiology or contagious diseases. (e) Two individuals who work in health care and specialize in occupational safety and health. (3) The director shall appoint the first members to the commission not later than 60 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (4) The director of the department of labor and economic opportunity shall appoint 2 of the first members to 1-year terms, 2 of the first members to 2-year terms, and 5 of the first members to 3-year terms. After the first appointments, the term of a member of the commission is 3 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later. (5) If a vacancy occurs on the commission, the director shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (6) The director may remove a member of the commission for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (7) The director shall call the first meeting of the commission. At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of 5 or more members. (8) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for transacting business. A majority of the members serving is required for any action of the commission. (9) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the commission in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (10) A member of the commission is not entitled to compensation for service on the commission, but the commission may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (11) The commission shall do all of the following: (a) Determine the best practices for employees during an emergency declared because of an infectious disease, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) Appropriate personal protective equipment for use by employees. (ii) The number and placement of handwashing and hand sanitizing stations. (iii) Distancing requirements between employees and between employees and the public. (iv) Any process or protocol that the commission believes is needed to protect the safety of employees and the public. (b) Not later than 120 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, prepare a report of the determinations made under subdivision (a) and make the report available to the public on the department of labor and economic opportunity's website. (12) An employer shall post the report described in subsection (11)(b) in a conspicuous location at each of the employer's workplaces. If the employer does not post the report as required under this subsection, the employer shall not take disciplinary action or otherwise discriminate against an employee who leaves work or refuses to report to work during an emergency declared because of an infectious disease.